Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1202, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1202. A. The Department of Transportation, the


Oklahoma Turnpike Authority, and the Corporation Commission may


enter into interagency agreements concerning the equipment,


maintenance, and operations of fixed facilities.


B. The Department of Transportation, the Authority, and the


Commission shall endeavor to electronically upgrade weigh stations


as practical to minimize the duplication of inspections for


compliant commercial motor vehicles and motor carriers.





Req. No. 2548 Page 1


C. The Commission shall operate all current and future ports of


entry weigh stations eighteen (18) to twenty (20) hours a day and


seven (7) days a week upon the availability of funds.


D. The Commission shall continue to conduct roadside


enforcement in the general area where a fixed facility is planned


but no fixed facility currently exists until a fixed facility is


located in the general area or July 1, 2016, whichever is earlier.


E. When a fixed facility is located in the general area,


Commission motor carrier and commercial motor vehicle enforcement


shall be limited to the fixed facility and a radius surrounding the


facility. If the fixed facility is a weigh station as defined in


Section 1201 of this title, the applicable radius shall be seven (7)


miles. If the fixed facility is a port of entry weigh station as


defined in Section 1201 of this title, the applicable radius shall


be twenty-five (25) miles.


F. The Commission may assist in conduct roadside enforcement in


a joint effort at the request of the Oklahoma Highway Patrol or a


county sheriff or a county commissioner seeking enforcement within


his or her county.


G. The Commission is authorized to conduct audits, reviews,


investigations, inspections, or other enforcement actions by


enforcement officers provided those activities are within the scope


of the Commission’s jurisdiction and are not conducted as roadside



Req. No. 2548 Page 2


enforcement in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Weigh


Station Act of 2012.


H. The Commission may enter into interagency cooperative


agreements with other state or federal agencies to jointly enforce


federal and state laws or rules.


I. North American Standard Inspections shall be conducted only


by individuals holding certification in the level or classification


of inspection being conducted.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2548 CN 12/18/2025 4:04:28 PM



























Req. No. 2548 Page 3